Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2512
City street superintendent, defined; incentive payment.

An incentive payment shall be made to each municipality or municipal county having appointed and employed a city street superintendent licensed under the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, during the calendar year preceding the year in which payment is made. For purposes of sections 39-2511 to 39-2515, city street superintendent means a person who assists the municipality or municipal county with the following:

(1) Developing and annually updating a long-range plan or program based on needs and coordinated with adjacent local governmental units;

(2) Developing an annual program for design, construction, and maintenance;

(3) Developing an annual budget based on programmed projects and activities;

(4) Submitting such plans, programs, and budgets to the local governing body for approval; and

(5) Implementing the capital improvements and maintenance activities provided in the approved plans, programs, and budgets.

Laws 1969, c. 316, § 2, p. 1139;

Laws 1976, LB 724, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 46;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB277, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB82, § 15;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 18.

County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, see section 39-2301.